Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.120

Actions against license—Exception.

The department shall not issue any license to any person whose license has been denied, revoked, or suspended by the disciplining authority except in conformity with the terms and conditions of the certificate or order of denial, revocation, or suspension, or in conformity with any order of reinstatement issued by the disciplining authority, or in accordance with the final judgment in any proceeding for review instituted under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 279 s 12.]